Hawaii statutes.
§414D-302 Inspection of records by members.
(a) Subject to sections 414D-301(e) and 414D-303(c), a member is entitled to
inspect and copy, at a reasonable time and location specified by the
corporation, any of the records of the corporation described in section
414D-301(e) if the member gives the corporation written notice or a written
demand at least five business days before the date on which the member wishes
to inspect and copy.

(b) A member is
entitled to inspect and copy, at a reasonable time and reasonable location
specified by the corporation, any of the following records of the corporation
if the member meets the requirements of subsection (c) and gives the
corporation written notice at least five business days before the date on which
the member wishes to inspect and copy:

(1) Excerpts from any records required to be
maintained under section 414D-301(a), to the extent not subject to inspection
under subsection (a);

(2) Accounting records of the corporation; and

(3) Subject to sections 414D-109(b) and 414D-305, the
membership list.

(c) A member may inspect and copy the records
identified in subsection (b) only if:

(1) The member's demand is made in good faith and for
a proper purpose;

(2) The member describes with reasonable
particularity the purpose and the records the member desires to inspect; and

(3) The records are directly connected with this
purpose.

(d) This section does not affect:

(1) The right of a member to inspect records:

(A) Under section 414D-109; or

(B) If the member is in litigation with the
corporation to the same extent as any other litigant; or

(2) The power of a court, independently of this
chapter, to compel the production of corporate records for examination. [L
2001, c 105, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 130, §68]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next